District of Columbia statutes.
2-1403.14

Judicial review.

Any person suffering a legal wrong, or adversely affected or aggrieved by an order or decision of the Commission in a matter pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, is entitled to a judicial review thereof, in accordance with § 2-510, upon filing, in the District of Columbia Court of Appeals, a written petition for such review.

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, title III, § 314, 24 DCR 6038
This section is referenced in § 2-1403.15.
1981 Ed., § 1-2554.
1973 Ed., § 6-2294.